California statutes. Business and Professions Code
 manufacturer, a beer manufacturer, a winegrower, a wine blender, distilled spirits rectifier, a wine rectifier, distilled spirits wholesaler, or beer and wine wholesaler who sold and delivered beer, wine, or distilled spirits to a retailer and who did not receive payment in full by the expiration of the 30th day from date of delivery or who has not received payment of the 1 percent charge at the expiration of the 30th day from the day the charge became due shall thereafter sell beer, wine, or distilled spirits to that retailer by receiving payment in advance of delivery until such time as all payments are received for the beer, wine, or distilled spirits sold and delivered to the said retailer more than 30 days previously.

(c) The 42-day period and the 30-day period provided for in this section shall commence with the day immediately
 following the date of invoice and shall include all successive days including Sundays and holidays to and including the 42nd or 30th day as the case may be. When the 42nd day from date of invoice or the expiration of each additional 30-day period falls on Saturday, Sunday, or legal holiday, the next business day shall be deemed to be the expiration day.

(d) All moneys received from a retailer in payment for any beer, wine, or distilled spirits sold and delivered to them shall be first applied to the payment of the oldest balance on beer, wine, or distilled spirits. All checks received for such payments shall be deposited for collection not later than the second business day following receipt of said check. A promissory note, postdated check, or check dishonored on presentation shall not be deemed payment.

(e) In enacting the act that amends this section by adding this subdivision, the Legislature finds that it is necessary and proper to remove the retailer from financial or business obligations to suppliers or wholesalers by the extension of credit beyond the terms contained in this section. The Legislature further finds that the exception established by this section to the general prohibition against tied interests shall be limited to its express terms so as not to undermine the general prohibition, and intends that this section shall be construed accordingly.

(f) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2026.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 1) and added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 426, Sec. 2.   (AB 2991)   Effective January 1, 2025.   Operative January 1, 2026, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

25509.1.

(a) Commencing January 1, 2026, and except as provided in subdivision (b) and paragraph (3) of subdivision (c), payment from a retailer licensee to a wholesaler licensee for delivery of beer, wine, or distilled spirits shall be made by electronic funds transfer in accordance with the following requirements:

(1) The wholesaler licensee shall initiate the electronic funds transfer by
 initiating the withdrawal of funds from the retailer licensee’s bank
 account.

(2) The electronic funds transfer shall occur by the expiration of the 30th day from the date of delivery of the beer, wine, or distilled spirits.

(3) Any costs related to electronic payment services shall be paid by the party that incurred those costs.

(A) Any service fees related to electronic payment transactions shall be applied in an equitable manner to each subscribing wholesaler and retailer and shall justifiably match the services they receive from the electronic payment service provider.

(B) The wholesaler shall not pay, directly or indirectly, for electronic payment service fees incurred by a retailer.

(C) The retailer shall not pay, directly or indirectly, for electronic payment service fees incurred by a wholesaler.

(b) A payment may be made using cash, check, or money order only in the following instances:

(1) If accepting payment following an electronic funds transfer of insufficient funds.

(2) If the retailer licensee holds an interim operating permit pursuant to Section 24044.5 or a temporary permit pursuant to Section 24045.5.

(3) During temporary service interruption of the third-party payment processor.

(4) During the first 30 days following the issuance of a license to the retailer licensee.

(c) (1) To maintain control of its ability to receive payment for delivery, a wholesaler licensee shall be responsible for selecting the third-party payment processor used to
 facilitate an electronic funds transfer pursuant to this section. The wholesaler and retailer may agree on the third-party payment processor. If the parties are unable to agree, the parties shall use the third-party payment processor used by the retailer as of July 1, 2025, to pay for wholesale alcohol purchases. If by July 1, 2025, the
 retailer does not
 use a third-party payment processor, the parties shall use the third-party payment processor selected by the wholesaler.

(2) A wholesaler licensee shall not select a third-party payment processor that does not meet the requirements of this section or that requires more than 30 days’ notice from the wholesaler licensee to terminate the processor’s agreement with the wholesaler licensee.

(3) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), a wholesaler may choose to accept credit card payments. If payment is made using a credit card, the retailer shall bear the cost of the transaction, so as to mitigate the value of secondary benefits realized by the retailer using the credit card.

(d) A retailer shall not accept a rebate, incentive, or other thing of value from a third-party payment processor for a payment made pursuant to this section.

(e) For purposes of this section,
 “electronic funds transfer” or “EFT” means the electronic transfer of money from one bank account to another, either within a single financial institution or across multiple institutions, via computer-based
 systems.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 426, Sec. 3.   (AB 2991)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

25510.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, a manufacturer may furnish to a licensed wholesaler, and a licensed wholesaler or manufacturer may furnish to an on-sale licensee, only the following specified items of alcoholic beverage tapping equipment: kegs, tapping heads, air lines, alcoholic beverage lines, clamps, washers, coupling devices, rods, vents, valves, keg spacers, and filters for an initial installation in a new on-sale licensed account or for a changeover of equipment from one tapping system to another. A supplier may service, repair, and replace the above-specified items of alcoholic beverage tapping equipment as necessary. This section shall not permit a supplier to furnish or repair alcoholic beverage equipment not specified in this section to an on-sale licensee. Alcoholic beverage tapping equipment furnished by a supplier shall remain the property of the supplier.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 604, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

25511.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this division, a manufacturer or wholesaler, or any officer, director, or agent of any of those persons may furnish, give, rent, lend, or sell, directly or indirectly, any equipment, fixtures, or supplies, other than alcoholic beverages, to a retailer whose equipment, fixtures, or supplies were lost or damaged as a result of a natural disaster and whose premises are located in an area proclaimed to be in a state of disaster by the Governor.

This section does not apply to transactions that occur three months or more after the Governor proclaims an area
 to be in a state of disaster.

Nothing in this section is intended to affect or otherwise limit Section 23104.1, 23104.2, or 23104.3.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 367, Sec. 2.   (AB 573)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

25512.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of this division, any licensee or officer, director, employee, or agent of a licensee that holds no more than eight on-sale licenses may also hold not more than 16.67 percent of the stock of a corporation that holds a Type 01 or Type 23 beer manufacturer license as specified in subdivision (b) of Section 23320 that are located in Sacramento, Placer, Contra Costa, San Joaquin, or Napa County, and may serve on the board of directors and as an officer or employee of that corporate licensed beer manufacturer.

(b) An on-sale licensee specified in subdivision (a) shall purchase no alcoholic beverages for sale in this state other than from a licensed wholesaler or winegrower.

(c) In enacting this section, the Legislature finds that it is necessary and proper to require a separation between manufacturing interests, wholesale interests, and retail interests in the production and distribution of alcoholic beverages in order to prevent suppliers from dominating local markets through vertical integration and to prevent excessive sales of alcoholic beverages produced by overly aggressive marketing techniques. The Legislature further finds that the exception established by this section to the general prohibition against tied-house interests must be limited to its expressed terms so as not to undermine the general prohibition, and intends that this section be construed accordingly.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 29, Sec. 69.   (SB 82)   Effective June 27, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 16. Regulatory Provisions [25600. - 25692.]



  ARTICLE 1. In General [25600. - 25625.]

25600.

(a) (1) No licensee shall, directly or indirectly, give any premium, gift, or free goods in connection with the sale or distribution of any alcoholic beverage, except as provided by rules that shall be adopted by the department to implement this section or as authorized by this division.

(2) (A) Notwithstanding paragraph (1), for purposes of this section, a refund to, or exchange of products for, a dissatisfied consumer by a licensee authorized to sell to consumers shall not be deemed a premium, gift, or free goods given in connection with the sale or distribution of an alcoholic beverage.

(B) A winegrower may advertise or otherwise offer consumers a
 guarantee of product satisfaction only in newsletters or other publications of the winegrower or at the winegrower’s premises. A winegrower may refund to a dissatisfied consumer the entire purchase price of wine produced by that winegrower and sold to that consumer, regardless of where the wine was purchased.

(3) (A) Notwithstanding paragraph (1), a winegrower, a beer manufacturer, a distilled spirits manufacturer, a craft distiller, a brandy manufacturer, a rectifier, or a wine rectifier may donate a portion of the purchase price of an alcoholic beverage to a nonprofit charitable organization in connection with the sale or distribution of an alcohol beverage, subject to all of the following limitations:

(i) The donation is only in connection with the sale or distribution of alcoholic beverages in manufacturer-sealed containers.

(ii) Promotion or advertisement of the donation shall not directly encourage or reference the consumption of alcoholic beverages.

(iii) A donation shall not benefit a retail licensee, or benefit a nonprofit charitable organization established for the specific purpose of benefiting the employees of retail licensees and the advertisement or promotion of a donation, shall not, directly or indirectly, advertise, promote, or reference any retail licensee. This is not intended to preclude the identification of licensed retailers as permitted by Section 25500.1.

(B) This paragraph shall be inoperative on January 1, 2030.

(b) (1) Except as provided in paragraph (2), no rule of the department may permit a licensee to give any premium, gift, or free goods of greater than inconsequential value in connection with the sale or distribution of beer. With respect to beer, premiums, gifts, or free goods, including advertising specialties that have no significant utilitarian value other than advertising, shall be deemed to have greater than inconsequential value if they cost more than twenty-five cents ($0.25) per unit, or cost more than fifteen dollars ($15) in the aggregate for all those items given by a single supplier to a single retail premises per calendar year.

(2) (A) No rule of the department may impose a dollar limit for consumer advertising specialties furnished by a beer manufacturer to the general public other than three dollars ($3) per unit original
 cost to the beer manufacturer who purchased it.

(B) With respect to beer, a beer manufacturer may give consumer advertising specialties to the general public that do not exceed three dollars ($3) per unit original cost to the beer manufacturer who purchased it. For purposes of this paragraph, “beer manufacturer” includes a holder of a beer manufacturer’s license, a holder of an out-of-state beer manufacturer’s certificate, an out-of-state vendor that holds a certificate of compliance, or a holder of a beer and wine importer’s general license. A licensee authorized to give consumer advertising specialties pursuant to this paragraph shall not be precluded from doing so on the basis of holding any other type of alcoholic beverage license.

(C) A beer manufacturer, as defined in subparagraph (B) of paragraph (2) shall not require a beer wholesaler to fund the purchase of consumer
 advertising specialties that beer manufacturers are permitted to give under paragraph (2).

(D) Consumer advertising specialties furnished by a beer manufacturer are intended only for adults of legal drinking age. Coin banks, toys, balloons, magic tricks, miniature bottles or cans, confections, dolls, or other items that appeal to minors or underage drinkers may not be used in connection with the merchandising of beer.

(c) With respect to distilled spirits and wines, a licensee may furnish, give, rent, loan, or sell advertising specialties to a retailer, provided those items bear conspicuous advertising required of a sign and the total value of all retailer advertising specialties furnished by a supplier, directly or indirectly, to a retailer do not exceed fifty dollars ($50) per brand in any one calendar year per retail premises. The value of a retailer advertising specialty is
 the actual cost of that item to the supplier who initially purchased it, excluding transportation and installation costs. The furnishing or giving of any retailer advertising specialty shall not be conditioned upon the purchase of the supplier’s product. Retail advertising specialties given or furnished free of charge may not be sold by the retail licensee. No rule of the department may impose a dollar limit for consumer advertising specialties furnished by a distilled spirits supplier to a retailer or to the general public of less than five dollars ($5) per unit original cost to the supplier who purchased it. A rule or decision of the department may not approve glassware as an authorized retailer advertising specialty for distilled spirits or wine under this section.

(d) (1) Notwithstanding any other provision of this division, a beer manufacturer or distilled spirits manufacturer may provide directly to consumers free or
 discounted rides through taxicabs, transportation network companies, or any other ride service for the purpose of furthering public safety. The free or discounted rides may be provided by vouchers, codes, or any other method to deliver the free or discounted ride. A free or discounted ride, or the provision of a voucher, code, or other method of delivery, shall not be conditioned upon the purchase of an alcoholic beverage. A beer and wine wholesaler or distilled spirits importer general that holds a wholesaler’s or retailer’s license only as an additional license shall not directly or indirectly underwrite, share in, or contribute to, the costs of free or discounted rides or serve as an agent of a beer manufacturer or distilled spirits manufacturer to provide free or discounted rides to consumers. Nothing in this provision authorizes a beer manufacturer or distilled spirits manufacturer to provide a gift or anything of value directly or indirectly to a retail licensee.

(2) For purposes of this section:

(A) “Beer manufacturer” has the same meaning as defined in subparagraph (B) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (b).

(B) “Distilled spirits manufacturer” means a distilled spirits manufacturer, holder of a distilled spirits rectifier’s general license, distilled spirits manufacturer’s agent, brandy manufacturer, holder of an out-of-state distilled spirits shipper’s certificate, holder of a distilled spirits importer general’s license, or craft distiller.

(C) “Glassware” means a single-service glass container or nonglass container capable of holding no more than 23 ounces of liquid volume or a decanter, chalice, infusion jar, or similar container of any size and made of any material.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 230, Sec. 2.   (AB 3285)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

25600.05.

(a) For purposes of this section:

(1) “Beer manufacturer” has the same meaning as that term is defined in subparagraph (B) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (b) of Section 25600.

(2) “Case” means a box containing up to 24 pieces of glassware.

(3) “Glassware” means a single-service glass container or nonglass container capable of holding no more than 23 ounces of liquid volume and which is intended for the service of beer.

(4) “Retail advertising glassware” means glassware that bears conspicuous advertising of beer required of a sign.

(b) Notwithstanding Section 25500, Section 25600, or any other law to the contrary:

(1) A beer manufacturer, without direct or indirect charge, may give up to five cases of retail advertising glassware to an on-sale retail licensee, per licensed location, each calendar year for use at the licensed location. The giving of retail advertising glassware shall not be conditioned, directly or indirectly, upon the purchase or sale of any product, including, without limitation, any beer manufactured, produced, imported, sold, marketed, or in any other way promoted or represented by the beer manufacturer giving the retail advertising glassware. Retail advertising glassware provided pursuant to this section shall only be delivered by the beer manufacturer providing it to the licensed premises of the retailer receiving the retail advertising glassware. No more than five cases of retail
 advertising glassware shall be delivered by the beer manufacturer to any single on-sale retail licensed premises.

(2) An on-sale retail licensee may accept, without direct or indirect charge, up to 10 cases of retail advertising glassware, per licensed location, from licensed beer manufacturers each calendar year for use at the licensed location. The on-sale retail licensee shall not sell the retail advertising glassware, give it away, or return it to a manufacturer for cash, credit, or replacement. The on-sale retail licensee shall not condition the purchase of a beer manufacturer’s product or products on the giving of retail advertising glassware by that beer manufacturer.

(c) A beer wholesaler shall not directly or indirectly underwrite, share in, or contribute to the costs of glassware or any costs of transportation or shipping or serve as the agent of the beer manufacturer to
 deliver, stock, or store glassware for an on-sale retailer.

(d) A licensee authorized to give retail advertising glassware pursuant to this section shall not be precluded from doing so on the basis of having an interest in any other type of alcoholic beverage license within or outside of the state.

(e) A beer manufacturer shall file with the department, in a manner prescribed by the department, records related to glassware provided to an on-sale retail licensee pursuant to this section within 30 days of the delivery of the glassware. In addition, a beer manufacturer shall keep and maintain records for a three-year period of all glassware given pursuant to this section.

(f) An on-sale retail licensee shall keep and maintain records for a three-year period of all glassware received pursuant to this section and of all
 other retail advertising glassware purchased or otherwise received. Such records shall be maintained by the on-sale retail licensee at the licensed premises to which the beer manufacturer delivers the glassware authorized by this section. The on-sale retail licensee shall produce records to the department promptly upon request.

(g) This section shall remain in effect only until January 1,
 2029, and as of that date is repealed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 153, Sec. 2.   (AB 445)   Effective January 1, 2026.   Repealed as of January 1, 2029, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

25600.1.

(a) An authorized licensee may conduct consumer contests, subject to the following conditions:

(1) (A) Entry or extra chances in a contest shall not be made available via the purchase of an alcoholic beverage.

(B) Entry into or participation in a contest shall be limited to persons 21 years of age or older.

(C) No contest shall involve consumption of alcoholic beverages by a participant.

(D) A contest may not be conducted for the benefit of any permanent retail licensee.

(2) (A) Closures, caps, cap liners, corks, labels, cartons, cases, packaging, or other similar material shall not be used as an entry to a contest or as a means of determining the amount or size of the prize or the winner in a contest, except as provided in subparagraphs (D) and (F).

(B) The authorized licensee shall provide an alternative means of entry that does not require a visit to a licensed premises.

(C) Except as provided in subparagraph (D), removable entry forms shall not be used on alcoholic beverage labels, containers, packaging, cases, or cartons.

(D) Removable entry forms that are neck hangers shall be used only on bottles of wine or distilled spirits, and shall not require purchase of the product. Removable neck hangers
 shall be used only if other entry forms are available at the point of sale or if an alternative means of entry is also available.

(E) Entry forms may be provided through electronic or other media, including point of sale.

(F) Codes that may be scanned or electronically entered by a consumer where the authorized licensee has permanently affixed the codes as part of the original alcoholic beverage label, container, packaging, case, or carton, and where the codes are not removable and not required to be removed are permitted as a form of entry.

(G) All permitted means of entry, including the use of electronic or scanner codes, shall clearly indicate that no purchase is required to enter.

(3) A contest shall not provide for the instant or immediate awarding
 of a prize or prizes. Instant or immediate notification to the consumer that he or she is a winner is permissible.

(4) Except for providing a means of entry, a contest authorized by this section shall not be conducted at the premises of a retail licensee or the premises of a winegrower or beer manufacturer operating under a duplicate license for a branch office.

(5) Alcoholic beverages or anything redeemable for alcoholic beverages shall not be awarded as a contest prize. This paragraph shall not prohibit a contest in which the prize is cash or cash equivalent, the awarding of cash or cash equivalent, or the inclusion of alcoholic beverages as an incidental part of a prize package.

(6) A retail licensee shall not serve as the agent of an authorized licensee by collecting or forwarding entries or awarding prizes to,
 or redeeming prizes for, a contest winner.

(7) A licensee that is not an authorized licensee shall not directly or indirectly underwrite, share in, or contribute to, the costs of a contest authorized by this section or serve as the agent of an authorized licensee to collect or forward entries or to furnish any prize to a contest winner.

(8) (A) Advertising of a contest shall comply with the signage and advertising restrictions contained in this chapter, Chapter 15 (commencing with Section 25500), and any regulations issued by the department.

(B) Advertising or promotion of a contest shall not identify or refer to any retail licensee.

(C) A retail licensee shall only advertise or promote a contest authorized by this section in the
 manner specified in subparagraph (A).

(D) Advertising or promotion of a contest shall only be conducted on the premises of a retail licensee when such advertisement or promotion involves a minimum of three unaffiliated retail licensees. For purposes of this subparagraph, “unaffiliated retail licensees” shall not include any retail licensee owned or controlled in whole or in part by an authorized licensee or any officer, director, or agent of that licensee.

(E) Placement of signs or other advertising of a contest in a licensed retail premises shall not be conditioned upon the following:

(i) The placement of any product within the licensed premises or the restriction, in any way, of the purchase of a product by a licensee, the removal of a product from the sales area of a licensed premises, or the resetting or
 repositioning of a product within the licensed premises.

(ii) The purchase or sale of any product produced, imported, distributed, represented, or promoted by an authorized licensee or its agent.

(F) An agreement, whether written or oral, entered into, by, and between a retail licensee and an authorized licensee or its agent that precludes the advertisement or promotion of a contest on the premises of the retail licensee by another authorized licensee is prohibited.

(9) Contest prizes shall not be awarded to an authorized licensee, retail licensee, or wholesale licensee or agent, officer, employee, or family member of an authorized licensee, retail licensee, or wholesale licensee. For the purposes of this paragraph, “family member” means a spouse, parent, sibling, child, son-in-law, daughter-in-law, and lineal
 descendants, including those by adoption. An authorized licensee shall maintain all records pertaining to a contest for three years following the completion of a contest. This section shall not apply to contests conducted by an authorized licensee as part of a sales incentive program for wholesale licensees or their employees or an authorized licensee’s employees.

(b) Nothing in this section shall preclude licensees from sponsoring contests as permitted by regulations of the department.

(c) For purposes of this section:

(1) (A) “Authorized licensee” means a winegrower, beer and wine importer general, beer manufacturer, out-of-state beer manufacturer certificate holder, distilled spirits manufacturer, distilled spirits manufacturer’s agent, distilled spirits importer general, distilled spirits
 general rectifier, rectifier, out-of-state distilled spirits shipper’s certificate holder, brandy manufacturer, and brandy importer. An authorized licensee may conduct a consumer contest pursuant to this section regardless of whether the licensee holds any additional license not included in this paragraph.

(B) An “authorized licensee” shall not include a beer and wine wholesaler, a beer and wine importer general, or distilled spirits importer general that only holds a wholesaler’s or retailer’s license as an additional license.

(2) “Contest” means a game, contest, puzzle, or similar activity that holds out or offers to participants the opportunity to receive or compete for gifts, prizes, gratuities, or other things of value as determined by skill, knowledge, or ability rather than upon random selection. Skill, knowledge, or ability does not include the consumption or use of
 alcoholic beverages.

(d) Nothing in this section authorizes conducting any contest where consumers are entitled to an allotment or accumulation of points based on purchases made over a period of time that can be redeemed for prizes, things of value, or additional contest entries.

(e) A prize awarded for a contest conducted pursuant to this section shall not be subject to the monetary limitation imposed by Section 25600 or a regulation of the department.

(f) An authorized licensee that violates this section, in addition to any other penalty imposed by this division, may be prohibited by the department from offering a contest to California residents for a period of 12 months.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 311, Sec. 4.   (SB 796)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

25600.2.

(a) An authorized licensee may conduct or sponsor consumer sweepstakes, subject to the following conditions:

(1) (A) No entry fee may be charged to participate in a sweepstakes authorized by this subdivision. Entry or extra chances in a sweepstakes shall not be made available via the purchase of an alcoholic beverage.

(B) Entry into or participation in a sweepstakes shall be limited to persons 21 years of age or older.

(C) No sweepstakes shall involve consumption of alcoholic beverages by a participant.

(D) Subject to subparagraph (B), any sweepstakes offered in California shall be open to all residents of California.

(E) A sweepstakes may not be conducted for the benefit of any permanent retail license.

(2) (A) Closures, caps, cap liners, corks, labels, cartons, cases, packaging, or other similar material shall not be used as an entry to a sweepstakes or as a means of determining the amount or size of the prize or the winner in a sweepstakes, except as provided in subparagraphs (D) and (F).

(B) The authorized licensee shall provide an alternative means of entry that does not require a visit to a licensed premises.

(C) Except as provided in subparagraph (D), removable entry forms shall not be used on alcoholic
 beverage labels, containers, packaging, cases, or cartons.

(D) Removable entry forms that are neck hangers shall be used only on bottles of wine or distilled spirits, and shall not require purchase of the product. Removable neck hangers shall be used only if other entry forms are available at the point of sale or if an alternative means of entry is also available.

(E) Entry forms may be provided through electronic or other media, including point of sale.

(F) Codes that may be scanned or electronically entered by a consumer where the authorized licensee has permanently affixed the codes as part of the original alcoholic beverage label, container, packaging, case, or carton and where the codes are not removable and not required to be removed are permitted as a form of entry.

(G) All permitted means of entry, including the use of electronic or scanner codes, shall clearly indicate that no purchase is required to enter.

(H) All sweepstakes entries shall provide the entrant with an equal odds of winning.

(3) A sweepstakes shall not provide for the instant or immediate awarding of a prize or prizes. Instant or immediate notification to the consumer that he or she is a winner is permissible.

(4) Except for providing a means of entry, a sweepstakes authorized by this section shall not be conducted at the premises of a retail licensee or the premises of a winegrower or beer manufacturer operating under a duplicate license for a branch office.

(5) Alcoholic beverages or
 anything redeemable for alcoholic beverages shall not be awarded as a sweepstakes prize. This paragraph shall not prohibit a sweepstakes in which the prize is cash or cash equivalent, the awarding of cash or cash equivalent, or the inclusion of alcoholic beverages as an incidental part of a prize package.

(6) A retail licensee shall not serve as the agent of an authorized licensee by collecting or forwarding entries or awarding prizes to, or redeeming prizes for, a sweepstakes winner. The matching of entries with numbers or pictures on the point-of-sale materials at retail licensed premises is permitted only if entrants are also offered the opportunity to use an alternative means to determine prize-winning status. An authorized licensee may furnish and maintain a deposit box on a retail licensed premises for the collection and forwarding of sweepstakes entry forms.

(7) A licensee
 that is not an authorized licensee shall not directly or indirectly underwrite, share in, or contribute to, the costs of a sweepstakes authorized by this section or serve as the agent of an authorized licensee to collect or forward entries or to furnish any prize to a sweepstakes winner.

(8) (A) Advertising of a sweepstakes shall comply with the signage and advertising restrictions contained in this chapter, Chapter 15 (commencing with Section 25500), and any regulations issued by the department.

(B) Advertising or promotion of a sweepstakes shall not identify or refer to a retail licensee.

(C) A retail licensee shall only advertise or promote a sweepstakes authorized by this section in the manner specified in subparagraph (A).

(D) Advertising or promotion of a sweepstakes shall only be conducted on the premises of a retail licensee when such advertisement or promotion involves a minimum of three unaffiliated retail licensees. For purposes of this subparagraph, “unaffiliated retail licensees” shall not include a retail licensee owned or controlled in whole or in part by an authorized licensee or any officer, director, or agent of that licensee.

(E) Placement of signs or other advertising of a sweepstakes in a licensed retail premises shall not be conditioned upon the following:

(i) The placement of a product within the licensed premises or the restriction, in any way, of the purchase of a product by a licensee, the removal of a product from the sales area of a licensed premises, or the resetting or repositioning of a product within the licensed premises.

(ii) The purchase or sale of a product produced, imported, distributed, represented, or promoted by an authorized licensee or its agent.

(F) An agreement, whether written or oral, entered into, by, and between a retail licensee and an authorized licensee that precludes the advertisement or promotion of a sweepstakes on the premises of the retail licensee by another authorized licensee or its agent is prohibited.

(9) Sweepstakes prizes shall not be awarded to an authorized licensee, retail licensee, or wholesale licensee or agent, officer, employee, or family member of an authorized licensee, retail licensee, or wholesale licensee. For the purposes of this paragraph, “family member” means a spouse, parent, sibling, child, son-in-law, daughter-in-law, and lineal descendants, including those by adoption. An authorized
 licensee shall maintain all records pertaining to a sweepstakes for three years following the completion of a sweepstakes.

(b) For purposes of this section:

(1) (A) “Authorized licensee” means a winegrower, beer and wine importer general, beer manufacturer, out-of-state beer manufacturer certificate holder, distilled spirits manufacturer, distilled spirits manufacturer’s agent, distilled spirits importer general, distilled spirits general rectifier, rectifier, out-of-state distilled spirits shipper’s certificate holder, brandy manufacturer, and brandy importer. An authorized licensee may conduct, sponsor, or participate in a sweepstakes pursuant to this section regardless of whether the licensee holds an additional license not included in this paragraph.

(B) An “authorized licensee” shall not
 include a beer and wine wholesaler, a beer and wine importer general, or distilled spirits importer general that only holds a wholesaler’s or retailer’s license as an additional license.

(2) “Sweepstakes” means a procedure, activity, or event for the distribution of anything of value by lot, chance, or random selection where the odds for winning a prize are equal for each entry.

(c) Nothing in this section authorizes conducting sweepstakes where consumers are entitled to an allotment or accumulation of points based on purchases made over a period of time that can be redeemed for prizes, things of value, or additional sweepstakes entries.

(d) A prize awarded for a sweepstakes conducted pursuant to this section shall not be subject to the monetary limitation imposed by Section 25600 or a regulation of the
 department.

(e) An authorized licensee that violates this section, in addition to any other penalty imposed by this division, may be prohibited by the department from offering a sweepstakes to California residents for a period of 12 months.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 311, Sec. 5.   (SB 796)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

25600.3.

(a) A nonretail licensee shall not offer, fund, produce, sponsor, promote, furnish, or redeem any type of coupon.

(b) A licensee authorized to sell alcoholic beverages at retail shall not accept, redeem, possess, or utilize any type of coupon that is funded, produced, sponsored, promoted, or furnished by a nonretail licensee.

(c) For purposes of this section:

(1) “Nonretail licensee” means any person who own or holds any interest, directly or indirectly, in any license, authorization, or permit issued pursuant to this division that authorizes the manufacture, production, rectification, importation, or wholesaling of alcoholic beverages,
 except for a brewpub restaurant license issued pursuant to Section 23396.3.

(2) “Cider” has the same meaning set forth in Section 4.21(e)(5) of the Code of Federal Regulations.

(3) “Perry” has the same meaning set forth in Section 4.21(e)(5) of the Code of Federal Regulations.

(4) “Coupon” means any method by which a consumer receives a discount on the purchase of any item that is funded, produced, sponsored, promoted, or furnished, either directly or indirectly, by a nonretail licensee, including, but not limited to, a paper coupon, a digital coupon, an instant redeemable coupon (IRC), or a mail-in rebate or mail-in discount, except as otherwise provided, or an electronic coupon commonly referred to as a scan or scanback. “Coupon” does not include:

(A) (i) A mail-in rebate or electronic or digital rebate where all of the following apply:

(I) The consumer must submit a request for the rebate to the nonretail licensee or its vendor after the purchase of a qualifying product.

(II) The rebate is paid to the consumer after the purchase of the qualifying product and receipt of the consumer’s request with any required information.

(III) The rebate is paid and funded by the nonretail licensee.

(ii) A retail licensee shall not act as the vendor or intermediary for the nonretail licensee or the consumer.

(iii) For purposes of this subparagraph, “nonretail license” and “vendor” shall not include an importer or
 wholesaler that holds only wholesaler or importer licenses, or both, that primarily sells beer, nonalcoholic beer, malt beverages, cider, or perry to retail licensees.

(B) A discount or rebate that is offered, funded, produced, sponsored, promoted, or furnished by a distilled spirits manufacturer, distilled manufacturer’s agent, brandy manufacturer, brandy importer, distilled spirits rectifier general, holder of an out-of-state distilled spirits shipper certificate, distilled spirits importer general, distilled spirits importer, rectifier, brandy wholesaler, distilled spirits wholesaler, or a holder of a craft distiller’s license, regardless of other licenses held, that offers a discount or rebate on the purchase of any item so long as no nonalcoholic beer, beer, malt beverages, or wine products are advertised or promoted by these licensees in connection with the discount or rebate.

(C) A discount that is offered and funded by a beer manufacturer on the purchase of beer, malt beverages, cider, or perry at the licensed premises of production or other licensed premises owned or leased and operated by the beer manufacturer.
